Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.312

[Art. 31] Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited.

(1) No person subject to this code may compel a person to incriminate himself or herself or to answer any question the answer to which may tend to incriminate himself or herself.

(2) No person subject to this code may interrogate, or request any statement from, an accused or a person suspected of an offense without first informing the person of the nature of the accusation and advising that the person does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which he or she is accused or suspected and that any statement made by the person may be used as evidence against him or her in a trial by court-martial.

(3) No person subject to this code may compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military tribunal if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend to degrade the person.

(4) No statement obtained from any person in violation of this section, or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement may be received in evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

[ 2009 c 378 s 15; 1989 c 48 s 30; 1963 c 220 s 33.]